src/fst/morphology/stems/smj-propernouns.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

 

! ======================== !
! Proper name lexicon part !
! ======================== !

! Table of contents
! -----
! *FirstComponentProper
! *ProperNoun-smj-nocomp
! *ProperNoun-smj
! *Assimilated propernoun, first part from other language
! **ProperNoun-assimilated from nob/swe/eng
! **ProperNoun-assimilated from sma
! **ProperNoun-assimilated from sme
! **Unassimilated
! **Err/Orth tags with norm in SMI-file** 


LEXICON FirstComponentProper !!= * **@CODE@** Proper shortcomponents
   Áksjovuodna+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+CmpNP/Pref+Cmp/Sh:Áksjovuon%>  RHyph ;
      Ájluokta+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+CmpNP/Pref+Cmp/Sh:Ájluovt%>    RHyph ;
     Utsvuodna+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+CmpNP/Pref+Cmp/Sh:Uhtsvuon%>   RHyph ;
   Vuodnabahta+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+CmpNP/Pref+Cmp/Sh:Vuodnabat%>  RHyph ;
   Rudnávuodna+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+CmpNP/Pref+Cmp/Sh:Rudnávuon%>  RHyph ;
   Bákteluokta+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+CmpNP/Pref+Cmp/Sh:Bákteluovt%> RHyph ;
     Gásluokta+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+CmpNP/Pref+Cmp/Sh:Gásluovt%>   RHyph ;
 Biehtselåpptå+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+CmpNP/Pref+Cmp/Sh:Biehtslåpt%> RHyph ;
       Ájládde+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+CmpNP/Pref+Cmp/Sh:Ájlát%>      RHyph ;

LEXICON ProperNoun-smj-nocomp
Ánu ACCRA-mal ;
Snev BERN-sur ;

LEXICON OLang/SMS ! <---Partly assimilated Skolt Saami proper nouns--->
Njávddám+OLang/SMS:Njávddám TJIERREK-plc ;


LEXICON ERR/ORTH ! <---Err/Orth tags with norm in SMI-file---> 
Kirishi+Err/Orth+OLang/RUS:Kirisji NYSTØ-plc ;
Wallmark+Err/Orth+OLang/ENG:Wallmarkka MARJA-sur ;

! <---unassimilated proper nouns---> 
! Propers here are not in smi file b/c it has an assimilated form in sme/sma and therefore the unassimilated form is only found in a LOAN lexicon 


LEXICON UNASS-SM! <---Unassimilated Pite Saami proper nouns--->

Bájjdár+OLang/SJE+Use/-Spell:Bájjdár TJIERREK-plc ; 

!LEXICON UNASS-SMA <---Unassimilated South Saami proper nouns--->
!Aarporte+OLang/SMA:Aarporte ACCRA-plc ;
!Vápste+OLang/SMA:Vápste ACCRA-plc ;
!Raarvihke+OLang/SMA:Raarvihke ACCRA-plc ;
!Staare+OLang/SMA:Staare ACCRA-plc ;
!Aajege+OLang/SMA:Aajege ACCRA-org ;
!Gaaltije+OLang/SMA:Gaaltije ACCRA-org ;
!Gïelem% nastedh+MWE+OLang/SMA:Gïelem% nastedh BERN-org ;
!Jillen-Njaarke+OLang/SMA:Jillen-Njaarke ACCRA-plc ;
!Maajehjaevrie+OLang/SMA:Maajeh#jaevrie ACCRA-plc ; 
!Noereh+OLang/SMA:Noereh BERN-org ; 
!Plassje+OLang/SMA:Plassje ACCRA-plc ; ! Gives illative -ij, but should be -ej?
!Saemien% Sïjte+MWE+OLang/SMA:Saemien% Sïjte ACCRA-org ;
!Sïjte+OLang/SMA:Sïjte ACCRA-org ;
!Sjeltie+OLang/SMA:Sjeltie ACCRA-plc ;
!Snåase+OLang/SMA:Snåase ACCRA-plc ; ! Gives illative -ij, but should be -ej?
!Tråante+OLang/SMA:Tråante ACCRA-LOAN-plc ; 
!Vaapste+OLang/SMA:Vaapste ACCRA-plc ;
!Åarjel-Saemiej% Gïelh+MWE+OLang/SMA:Åarjel-Saemiej% Gïelh BERN-org ;
!Åarjelhsaemien% teatere+MWE+OLang/SMA:Åarjelhsaemien% teatere ACCRA-org ;
!Saemien% Sijte+MWE+OLang/SMA:Saemien% Sijte ACCRA-org ; 
!Svahken% Sijte+MWE+OLang/SMA:Svahken% Sij9te ACCRA-org ;
!Svahken% Sijte+MWE+OLang/SMA+Err/Orth:Svahken% sij9te ACCRA-org ;
!Vuaksaåelkie+OLang/SMA:Vuaksaåelkie ACCRA-plc ;
!Gaarphkdaelie+OLang/SMA:Gaarphkdaelie ACCRA-plc ;
!Máresvállie+OLang/SMA:Máresvállie ACCRA-plc ;
!Fátmie+OLang/SMA:Fátmie ACCRA-sur ;
!Luspie+OLang/SMA:Luspie ACCRA-plc ;
!Luvlieluspie+OLang/SMA:Luvlieluspie ACCRA-plc ;
!Aahkavaerie+OLang/SMA:Aahkavaerie ACCRA-plc ;
!Jiingevaerie+OLang/SMA:Jiingevaerie ACCRA-plc ;
!Jovnevaerie+OLang/SMA:Jovnevaerie ACCRA-plc ;
!Aajrie+OLang/SMA:Aajrie ACCRA-plc ;
!Árviesjávrrie+OLang/SMA:Árviesjávrrie ACCRA-plc ;
!Buvriejaevrie+OLang/SMA:Buvriejaevrie ACCRA-plc ;
!Graesiejaevrie+OLang/SMA:Graesiejaevrie ACCRA-plc ;
!Åanghkejaevrie+OLang/SMA:Åanghkejaevrie ACCRA-plc ;
!Såålejaevrie+OLang/SMA:Såålejaevrie ACCRA-plc ;
!Kruvhtegenjaevrie+OLang/SMA:Kruvhtegenjaevrie ACCRA-plc ;
!Jitnemenjaevrie+OLang/SMA:Jitnemenjaevrie ACCRA-plc ;
!Saantenjaevrie+OLang/SMA:Saantenjaevrie ACCRA-plc ;
!Aalesjaevrie+OLang/SMA:Aalesjaevrie ACCRA-plc ;
!Gïeje+OLang/SMA:Gïeje ACCRA-obj ;
!Nååmesje+OLang/SMA:Nååmesje ACCRA-plc ;
!Åarkanjohke+OLang/SMA:Åarkanjohke ACCRA-plc ;
!Jitnemenjohke+OLang/SMA:Jitnemenjohke ACCRA-plc ;
!Vuerjemjåhkå+OLang/SMA:Vuerjem^jåhkå MARJA-plc ;
!Fovsen% Njaarke+MWE+OLang/SMA:Fovsen% Njaarke ACCRA-org ;
!Raasten% Rastah+MWE+OLang/SMA:Raasten% Rastah LONDON-org ;



LEXICON flagpropK
@U.Cap.Obl@ K ;

LEXICON UNASS-SME! <---Unassimilated North Saami proper nouns--->
Muitte% mu+MWE+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Acc+OLang/SME:Muitte% mu flagpropK ;
Muitte% mu+MWE+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Gen+OLang/SME:Muitte% mu flagpropK ;
Muitte% mu+MWE+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom+OLang/SME:Muitte% mu flagpropK ;
